Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.025

Certificates—Samples for inspection and testing—Publish information—Notify purchasers of results.

The director may:

(1) Issue certificates stating that planting stock found by the director or other authorized person to be in compliance with rules adopted under this chapter is foundation, registered, or certified planting stock.

(2) Take samples in reasonable amounts as necessary of planting stock to inspect and test for genetic characteristics and/or freedom from infection by plant pests.

(3) Publish names of growers participating in certification programs and inspection results.

(4) Require growers participating in certification programs to notify purchasers of planting stock when postharvest inspections or tests show the planting stock represented as foundation, registered, or certified has failed to meet minimum standards for certification.

[ 1999 c 144 s 3; 1961 c 83 s 7. Formerly RCW 15.14.070.]